Hawaii statutes.
§653-15 Actions, precedence. In case
of successive actions being brought against any beneficiary, in which any
portion of the beneficiary's salary, stipend, or wages is sought to be
sequestered, as provided herein, precedence shall be given by the garnishee to
one whose process is first served upon the garnishee; and if two or more such
processes are simultaneously served upon the garnishee, they shall be entitled
to precedence in the order of the priority of their issue by the court or
courts from which they respectively emanated, subject to section 653-16. [L
1890, c 50, §14; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2859; RL 1935, §4304; RL 1945,
§10335; RL 1955, §238-15; HRS §653-15; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next